da: Sværhedsgrad: Nem; Ekspert; Hård; Medium; Andet
ja: 難易度: 簡単; エキスパート; ハード; 媒体; その他
sk-SK: Úroveň obtiažnosti: Ľahký; Expert; Ťažký; Stredný; Iné
vi: Cấp độ khó: Dễ; Chuyên gia; Cứng; Vừa; Khác
el: Επίπεδο δυσκολίας: Εύκολο; Για αυθεντίες; Σκληρή; Μέση; Άλλο
sl-SI: Stopnja težavnosti: Enostavno; Zelo težko; Težko; Srednja; Drugo
zh-TW: 難度等級: 簡單; 專家; 硬; 媒介; 其他
zh-CN: 难度级别: 简单; 专家; 硬; 媒介; 其他
lt-LT: Sudėtingumo lygis: Lengva; Ekspertas; Sunku; Vidutiniška; Kita
fr: Niveau de difficulté: Facile; Expert; Difficile; Moyen; Autre
nl: Moeilijkheidsgraad: Eenvoudig; Deskundige; Hard; Medium; Andere
hr-HR: Razina težine: Lako; Stručnjak; Teško; Srednje; Ostalo
sv: Svårighetsgrad: Lätt; Expert; Hård; Medium; Övrigt
hu: Nehézségi szint: Könnyű; Professzionális; Nehéz; Közepes; Egyéb
ro-RO: Nivel de dificultate: Ușor; Expert; Dificil; Mediu; Altele
en: Difficulty level: Easy; Expert; Hard; Medium; Other
pt-PT: Nível de dificuldade: Fácil; Especialista; Duro; Médio; Outro
th: ระดับความยาก: ง่าย; ระดับมืออาชีพ; แข็ง; สื่อ; อื่นๆ
de: Schwierigkeitsgrad: Einfach; Experten; Hart; Medium; Sonstiges
tr: Zorluk Seviyesi: Kolay; Uzman; Sert; Orta; Diğer
pt-BR: Nível de dificuldade: Fácil; Especialista; Duro; Médio; Outro
fi: Vaikeusaste: Helppo; Asiantuntija; Kova; Keskimääräinen; Muu
ru: Уровень сложности: Легко; Эксперт; Жесткий; Средний; Другой
cs: Stupeň obtížnosti: Snadné; Expert; Tvrdá; Médium; Jiné
nb: Vanskelighetsgrad: Lett; Ekspert; Hard; Middels; Annet
bg-BG: Ниво на трудност: Лесно; Експерт; Трудно; Средно; Други
it: Livello di difficoltà: Facile; Esperto; Dura; Medium; Altro
pl: Poziom trudności: Łatwo; Ekspert; Twardy; Środek; Inne
es: Nivel de dificultad: Fácil; Experto; Duro; Medio; Otros
ko: 난이도: 쉬움; 전문가; 하드; 매체; 기타